Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-513
Nonirrigable land, defined.

Wherever the term nonirrigable land is used in sections 46-501 to 46-573 it shall be taken to mean privately owned agricultural lands outside the corporate limits of cities or villages, which cannot be benefited by the use of water for irrigation purposes, and which would lie within any district established under the provisions of sections 46-501 to 46-573.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(11), p. 526.